Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.160

Limitation of liability.

(1) A law enforcement agency that is a governmental entity in this state which has implemented procedures reasonably designed to enforce the rules adopted pursuant to RCW 10.122.150 and ensure compliance with this chapter is not subject to civil liability for damages arising from a violation of this chapter.

(2) This chapter does not create a right of action against a law enforcement officer.

[ 2021 c 329 s 16.]